src/main/resources/tables/hyph_de_DE.dic
.z8w8e8r8c8h9f8e8l8l9e8r9s8c8h8ü8t9t8e8r8n9d8e.
.zwerchfellerschüttern1de
.z8w8e8r8c8h9f8e8l8l9e8r9s8c8h8ü8t9t8e8r8n9d8e8m.
.z8w8e8r8c8h9f8e8l8l9e8r9s8c8h8ü8t9t8e8r8n9d8e8n.
.z8w8e8r8c8h9f8e8l8l9e8r9s8c8h8ü8t9t8e8r8n9d8e8r.
.z8w8e8r8c8h9f8e8l8l9e8r9s8c8h8ü8t9t8e8r8n9d8e8s.
.z8w8e8r8g9a8m9m8e8r.
.zwer1ga
.zwerga2m1m
.zwergam1me
.z8w8e8r8g9a8m9m8e8r8n.
.zwergamme2rn
.z8w8e8r8g9a8p9f8e8l.
.zwergap1fe
.zwerg3apfel
.z8w8e8r9g8e8n9a8u8f9s8t8a8n8d.
.zwer1ge
.zwerge5na
.zwerge4n3auf
.zwergenau2fs
.zwergenauf1st
.zwergenauf1sta
.zwergenaufsta2n1d
.z8w8e8r9g8e8n9a8u8f9s8t8ä8n9d8e.
.zwergenauf1stä
.zwergenaufst8än
.zwergenaufstä2n1d
.zwergenaufstän1de
.z8w8e8r9g8e8n9a8u8f9s8t8ä8n9d8e8n.
.z8w8e8r9g8e8n9a8u8f9s8t8a8n9d8e8s.
.zwergenaufstan1de
.zwergenaufstande4s3
.z8w8e8r8g9l8e8i8n.
.zwerg3lein
.z8w8e8r8g9n8i8e9r8e.
.zwergn8
.zwer2g1ni2
.zwerg2n6ie
.zwergni2e1re
.z8w8e8r8g9o8b8s8t9b8a8u8m.
.zwer1go
.zwer8gob
.zwergo8bs
.zwergob2s2t1b2
.zwergobst1ba
.zwergobstb6aum
.z8w8e8r8g9o8r8a8n9g8e.
.zwergo1ra
.zwergo6rang
.zwergoran1ge
.z8w8e8r8g9o8r8a8n9g8e8n.
.zwergorang8en
.z8w8e8r8g9r8i8n8d.
.zwergri2n1d
.z8w8e8r8g9r8i8n9d8e8r.
.zwergr8in1de
.z8w8e8r8g9r8i8n9d8e8r8n.
.zwergrinde2rn
.z8w8e8r8g9r8o8s8t.
.z8w8e8r8g9s8t8e8r8n.
.zwer2gs
.zwergs1te
.zwergste2rn
.z8w8e8r8g9s8t8r8a8u8c8h.
.zwergstr6
.zwergstra2uc
.zwergstrauc8h
.z8w8e8r8g9s8t8r8ä8u9c8h8e8r.
.zwergsträ2uc
.zwergsträuc8h
.zwergsträu1che
.z8w8e8r8g9s8t8r8ä8u9c8h8e8r8n.
.zwergsträuche2rn
.z8w8e8r8g9z8i9k8a9d8e.
.zwergzi1k
.zwergzi1ka
.zwergzika1d
.zwergzika1de
.z8w8e8r8g9z8i9k8a9d8e8n.
.z8w8i9c8k8a8u9e8r.
.1zwi
.zwic2k
.zwic1ka
.zwickau1e
.zwickau1er
.z8w8i9c8k8e8r8s.
.zwicke2r1s
.z8w8i8e9b8ä9c8k8e.
.zwie1b
.zwie8bä
.zwiebäc2k
.z8w8i8e9b8ä9c8k8e8n.
.zwiebä1cken
.z8w8i8l9l8i8n8g8s9p8ä8r9c8h8e8n.
.zw2il
.zwi6ll
.zwil1li
.zwillin2gs5
.zwillingsp2
.zwillings8pär
.zwillingspär1c
.zwillingspärc8h
.zwillingspär1che
.z8w8i8l9l8i8n8g8s9p8ä8r9c8h8e8n8s.
.zwillingspärche6ns
.z8w8i8l9l8i8n8g8s9t8ö8c8h9t8e8r.
.zwilling1stö
.zwillingstöc8h
.zwillingstö2cht6
.zwillingstöch1te
.z8w8i8l9l8i8n8g8s9t8ö8c8h9t8e8r8n.
.zwillingstöchte2rn
.z8w8i8l9l8i8n8g8s9t8ü8r9m8e.
.zwilling1stü
.zwillingstü6r1m
.zwillingstür1me
.z8w8i8l9l8i8n8g8s9t8ü8r9m8e8n.
.z8w8i8n8g9l8i9a9n8e8r.
.zwing1li
.zwingli8a
.zwinglia1n8e
.z8w8i8n8g9l8i9a9n8e8r8n.
.zwingliane2rn
.z8w8i9s8c8h8e8n9a8b9l8a9g8e9i8n9h8a8l8t.
.zwi1s
.zwisc8h
.zwi1sche
.zwischena1bl8
.zwischenab1la
.zwischen5a6blag
.zwischenabla1ge
.zwischenablagein1h
.zwischenablageinha2l1t
.z8w8i9s8c8h8e8n9a8b9l8a9g8e9i8n9h8a8l9t8e.
.z8w8i9s8c8h8e8n9a8b9l8a9g8e9i8n9h8a8l9t8e8n.
.zwischenablageinhal5ten
.z8w8i9s8c8h8e8n9e8x9a9m8e8n.
.zwische1ne
.zwische2nex
.zwischenexa1me
.zwischenex3a4men
.z8w8i9s8c8h8e8n9h8i9n9e8i8n.
.zwischen1h
.zwischenhi1ne
.zwischenhi2n1ei
.zwischenhi4n1ein
.z8w8i9s8c8h8e8n9s8t8a9t8i9o9n8e8n.
.zwische6ns
.zwischen1sta
.zwischenst2a1ti
.zwischenstat2io
.zwischenstatio1ne
.z8w8i9s8c8h8e8n9s8t8e9c8k8e8r8s.
.zwischens1te
.zwischen3s2tec
.zwischenstec2k
.zwischenstecke2r1s
.z8w8i9s8c8h8e8n9s8t8i8e8l.
.zwischens1ti
.zwischens2ti4el
.z8w8i9s8c8h8e8n9s8t8ü9c8k8e.
.zwischen1stü
.zwischenstü8c2k
.z8w8i9s8c8h8e8n9s8t8ü9c8k8e8n.
.zwischenstü1cken
.z8w8i9s8c8h8e8n9s8z8e9n8e8n.
.zwischens1z
.zwischens1ze
.zwischensze1ne
.zwischensz6enen
.z8w8i8s9t8e8s.
.zwis1te
.z8w8i8s9t8i8g9k8e8i8t.
.zwis1ti
.zwisti2g1k
.z8w8i8s9t8i8g9k8e8i9t8e8n.
.zwistigkei1te
.z8w8ö8l8f9e8c8k8e.
.zwöl1fe
.zwöl2f1ec2k
.z8w8ö8l8f9e8c8k8e8n.
.zwölfe1cken
.z8w8ö8l8f9e8c8k8i8g.
.zwölfe1ckig
.z8w8ö8l8f9e8c8k8i9g8e.
.zwölfeck2i1ge
.z8w8ö8l8f9e8c8k8i9g8e8m.
.z8w8ö8l8f9e8c8k8i9g8e8n.
.z8w8ö8l8f9e8c8k8i9g8e8r.
.z8w8ö8l8f9e8c8k8i9g8e8s.
.zwölfeckige1s
.z8w8ö8l8f9e8i8n9h8a8l8b.
.zwölfein1h
.zwölfeinha2lb
.z8w8ö8l8f9e8n9d8e8r.
.zwölfe2n1d
.zwölfen1de
.z8w8ö8l8f9e8n9d8e8r8n.
.zwölfende2rn
.z8w8ö8l8f9e8n9d8e8r8s.
.zwölfend8e2r1s
.z8w8ö8l8f9s8e9m8e8s9t9r8i8g.
.zwöl2fs
.zwölf1se
.zwölfse1me
.zwölfse3mes
.zwölfseme1str6
.zwölfseme2s2t5r2ig
.z8w8ö8l8f9s8e9m8e8s9t9r8i9g8e.
.zwölfsemestr2i1ge
.z8w8ö8l8f9s8e9m8e8s9t9r8i9g8e8m.
.z8w8ö8l8f9s8e9m8e8s9t9r8i9g8e8n.
.z8w8ö8l8f9s8e9m8e8s9t9r8i9g8e8r.
.z8w8ö8l8f9s8e9m8e8s9t9r8i9g8e8s.
.zwölfsemestrige1s
.z8w8ö8l8f9z8y9l8i8n9d9r8i8g.
.zwöl2f1z
.zwölf1zy
.zwölfzy1li
.zwölfzyli2n1d
.zwölfzylind2r4
.zwölfzylind1r2ig
.z8w8ö8l8f9z8y9l8i8n9d9r8i9g8e.
.zwölfzylindr2i1ge
.z8w8ö8l8f9z8y9l8i8n9d9r8i9g8e8m.
.z8w8ö8l8f9z8y9l8i8n9d9r8i9g8e8n.
.z8w8ö8l8f9z8y9l8i8n9d9r8i9g8e8r.
.z8w8ö8l8f9z8y9l8i8n9d9r8i9g8e8s.
.zwölfzylindrige1s
.z8y9k9l8e8n.
.1zy
.zy1k2
.zykl8
.z8y9k9l8e8n9z8a8h8l.
.zyklen1za
.zyklen1zah
.z8y9k9l8e8n9z8a8h9l8e8n.
.zyklenzah1le
.z8y9k9l8i8s8c8h.
.zyk1li
.zyklisc8h
.z8y9k9l8i9s8c8h8e.
.zykli1sche
.z8y9k9l8i9s8c8h8e8m.
.z8y9k9l8i9s8c8h8e8n.
.z8y9k9l8i9s8c8h8e8r.
.z8y9k9l8i9s8c8h8e8s.
.z8y9k9l8o9i8d.
.zykloi1d
.z8y9k9l8o9i9d8e.
.zykloi1de
.z8y9k9l8o9i9d8e8n9b8o9g8e8n.
.zykloiden1b2
.zykloiden1bo
.zykloidenb8o1g
.zykloidenbo1ge
.z8y9k9l8o9i9d8e8n9b8o9g8e8n8s.
.zykloidenboge6ns
.z8y9k9l8o8n.
.zykl2on
.z8y9k9l8o9n8e.
.zyklo1ne
.z8y9k9l8o8n8s.
.zykl1o6ns
.z8y9k9l8o8p.
.zy5klop
.z8y9k9l8o9p8e8n.
.zyklo1pe
.z8y9k9l8o9p8e8n9a8u9g8e.
.zyklopen3aug
.zyklopenau1ge
.z8y9k9l8o9p8e8n9a8u9g8e8s.
.zyklopenauge1s
.z8y9k9l8o9p8e8n9m8a8u9e8r.
.zyklopen1m
.zyklopen1ma
.zyklopenmau1e
.zyklopenmau1er
.z8y9k9l8o9p8i8s8c8h.
.zyklo1pi
.zyklo1pis
.zyklopisc8h
.z8y9k9l8o9p8i9s8c8h8e.
.zyklopi1sche
.z8y9k9l8o9p8i9s8c8h8e8m.
.z8y9k9l8o9p8i9s8c8h8e8n.
.z8y9k9l8o9p8i9s8c8h8e8r.
.z8y9k9l8o9p8i9s8c8h8e8s.
.z8y9k9l8o9t9r8o8n.
.zyklotr6
.zyklo1tro
.zyklotr2on
.z8y9k9l8o9t9r8o9n8e.
.zyklotro1ne
.z8y9k9l8o9t9r8o9n8e8n.
.z8y9k9l8o9t9r8o8n8s.
.zyklotr1o6ns
.z8y9k9l8u8s.
.z8y9k9l8u8s9k8e8t9t8e.
.zyklus1k2
.zykluske2t1t
.z8y9k9l8u8s9z8e8i8t.
.zyklus1z
.zyklus1ze
.z8y9l8i8n9d8e8r9o8b8e8r9f8l8ä9c8h8e.
.zy1li
.zyli2n1d
.zylin1de
.zylinde1ro
.zylindero1be
.zylinderober1f
.zylinderober5f8läc
.zylinderoberfläc8h
.zylinderoberflä1che
.z8y9l8i8n9d9r8i8s8c8h.
.zylind2r4
.zylindr2is
.zylindrisc8h
.z8y9l8i8n9d9r8i9s8c8h8e.
.zylindri1sche
.z8y9l8i8n9d9r8i9s8c8h8e8m.
.z8y9l8i8n9d9r8i9s8c8h8e8n.
.z8y9l8i8n9d9r8i9s8c8h8e8r.
.z8y9l8i8n9d9r8i9s8c8h8e8s.
.z8y9l8i8n9d9r8o9i8d.
.zylindroi6
.zylindro5i1d
.z8y9p9r8e8s9s8e.
.zy1pr6
.zy1pres
.zyp2ress
.zypre2s1se
.z8y9p9r8e8s9s8e8n.
.z8y9p9r8e8s9s8e8n9f8i8c8h9t8e.
.zypressen1f
.zypressen1fi
.zypressenfic8h
.zypressenfi2cht
.zypressenfich1te
.z8y9p9r8e8s9s8e8n9f8i8c8h9t8e8n.
.z8y9p9r8e8s9s8e8n9h8a8i8n.
.zypressen1h
.z8y9p9r8e8s9s8e8n9h8a8i9n8e.
.zypressenhai1ne
.z8y9p9r8e8s9s8e8n9h8a8i9n8e8n.
.z8y9p9r8e8s9s8e8n9h8o8l8z.
.zypressen1holz
.z8y9p9r8e8s9s8e8n9h8o8l9z8e8s.
.zypressenhol1ze
.z8y9p9r8e8s9s8e8n9k8r8a8u8t.
.zypressen1kr8
.z8y9p9r8e8s9s8e8n9n8a9d8e8l.
.zypressen1na
.zypressenna1d
.zypressenna1de
.z8y9p9r8e8s9s8e8n9n8a9d8e8l8n.
.zypressennade6ln
.z8y9p9r8e8s9s8e8n9w8a8l8d.
.zypresse8n1w
.zypressenwa6ld
.z8y9p9r8e8s9s8e8n9w8ä8l8d9c8h8e8n.
.zypressenwä6ld
.zypressenwäl2d1c
.zypressenwäldc8h
.z8y9p9r8e8s9s8e8n9w8ä8l8d9c8h8e8n8s.
.zypressenwäldche6ns
.z8y9p9r8e8s9s8e8n9w8ä8l9d8e8r.
.zypressenwäl1de
.z8y9p9r8e8s9s8e8n9w8ä8l9d8e8r8n.
.zypressenwälde2rn
.z8y9p9r8e8s9s8e8n9w8a8l9d8e8s.
.zypressenwal1de
.z8y9p9r8i9o8t.
.zypr2io
.z8y9p9r8i9o9t8e8n.
.zyprio1te
.z8y9p9r8i9o9t8i8s8c8h.
.zyprio1ti
.zypriotisc8h
.z8y9p9r8i9o9t8i9s8c8h8e.
.zyprioti1sche
.z8y9p9r8i9o9t8i9s8c8h8e8m.
.z8y9p9r8i9o9t8i9s8c8h8e8n.
.z8y9p9r8i9o9t8i9s8c8h8e8r.
.z8y9p9r8i9o9t8i9s8c8h8e8s.
.z8y9p9r8i8s8c8h.
.zypr2is
.zyprisc8h
